Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8070.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47-42 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-42. Weapons other than firearms prohibited.
(a)(1) No person shall carry or possess or attempt to use against another any instrument or
weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slingshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, metal
knuckles, slap glove, bludgeon, stun-gun, or the so called “Kung-Fu” weapons; provided, however,
that any student, professor, or other employee of any public or private college or university, may
carry, possess and have in their custody, possession and/or under their control, a stun-gun or pepper
spray for purposes of self-defense.
(2) No person shall with intent to use unlawfully against another, carry or possess a
crossbow, dagger, dirk, stiletto, sword-in-cane, bowie knife, or other similar weapon designed to
cut and stab another.
(3) No person shall wear or carry concealed upon his person, any of the above-mentioned
instruments or weapons, or any razor, or knife of any description having a blade of more than three
(3) inches in length measuring from the end of the handle where the blade is attached to the end of
the blade, or other weapon of like kind or description.
Any person violating the provisions of these subsections shall be punished by a fine of not
more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both,
and the weapon so found shall be confiscated.

Any person violating the provisions of these subsections while he or she is incarcerated
within the confines of the adult correctional institutions shall be punished by a fine of not less than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment
for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, or both, and the weapon so found shall be
confiscated.
(b) No person shall sell to a person under eighteen (18) years of age, without the written
authorization of the minor’s parent or legal guardian, any stink bomb, blackjack, slingshot, bill,
sandclub, sandbag, metal knuckles, slap glove, bludgeon, stungun, paint ball gun, so called “kung-
fu” weapons, dagger, dirk, stiletto, sword-in-cane, bowie knife, razor, or knife of any description
having a blade of more than three inches (3″) in length as described in subsection (a) of this section,
or any multi-pronged star with sharpened edges designed to be used as a weapon and commonly
known as a Chinese throwing star, except that an individual who is actually engaged in the
instruction of martial arts and licensed under § 5-43-1 [repealed] may carry and possess any multi-
pronged star with sharpened edges for the sole purpose of instructional use. Any person violating
the provisions of this subsection shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars
($1,000) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or by imprisonment for not less than one
year nor more than five (5) years, or both, and the weapons so found shall be confiscated.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005454
========
LC005454 - Page 2 of 3